Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB567.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14984.3(c) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 14984.3. Operating reserve fund.* * *(c) Purpose of appropriations.--The county commissioners may, by resolution, make appropriations from the operating reserve fund only to:(1) meet emergencies involving the health, safety or welfare of the residents of the county;(2) counterbalance potential budget deficits resulting from shortfalls in anticipated revenues or program receipts 12345678910111213141516171819 from any source;(3) counterbalance potential budget deficits resulting from increases in anticipated costs of goods or services; [or](4) provide for anticipated operating expenditures related either to the planned growth of existing projects or programs or the establishment of new projects or programs if for each project or program appropriations have been made and allocated to a separate restricted account established within the operating reserve fund[.]; or(5) provide for the expenses related to countywide revisions of assessment.* * *Section 2. Title 53 is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 88AREGULAR CYCLICAL REVISION OF ASSESSMENTSec.88A01. Scope of chapter and applicability.88A02. Legislative findings and purpose.88A03. Definitions.88A04. Regular cyclical revision of assessment.88A05. Schedule of cyclical revision of assessment.88A06. Funding cyclical revision of assessment.88A07. Noncompliance.§ 88A01. Scope of chapter and applicability.(a) Scope.--This chapter shall apply to all counties of the second, second A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth classes, notwithstanding any provision of a home rule charter to the contrary.(b) Applicability.--20250SB0567PN1099 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A countywide revision of assessment conducted in accordance with this chapter shall not apply within any city of the third class conducting an assessment as provided in 11 Pa.C.S. § 12522(a)(2) (relating to assessment powers) until an election under 11 Pa.C.S. § 12522(a)(3) occurs.(2) After a countywide revision of assessment conducted in accordance with this chapter, a board of school directors of a school district located within that county shall comply with the limitations on tax increases applicable to a school district subject to section 327 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, as described in that section.§ 88A02. Legislative findings and purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Uniformity Clause of the Constitution of Pennsylvania requires that all taxes, including property taxes, be uniform within the territory of the taxing jurisdiction.(2) Political subdivisions in this Commonwealth levy taxes on real property according to a base year assessment that is not subject to any statutory requirement to conduct a countywide revision of assessment on a recurrent regular or needs basis.(3) The Supreme Court of Pennsylvania has held that the base year system of taxation has been rendered unconstitutional as applied where the prolonged and potentially indefinite use of an outdated base year assessment becomes stale, and thus violates the Uniformity Clause.(4) The Supreme Court determined that Pennsylvania is 20250SB0567PN1099 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the only state in the United States that allows the indefinite use of a base year by statute.(5) Numerous Pennsylvania courts, having found that an in-use base year assessment was unconstitutional as applied, have repeatedly ordered counties to conduct countywide revisions of assessment.(6) The Supreme Court has articulated that the General Assembly is the appropriate place to fashion a more comprehensive and soundly constitutional scheme.(7) Counties can facilitate a more uniform system of taxation on property by performing regular countywide revisions of assessment on all property on a regular and recurrent basis.§ 88A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Coefficient of dispersion." The average deviation from the median, mean or weighted mean ratio of assessed value to fair market value, expressed as a percentage of that figure."Countywide revision of assessment." A revaluation of all real property within a county."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Parcel data review." An update to the property record card to ensure consistency and accuracy of property characteristics using field, photographic or computer-aided data collection and review.§ 88A04. Regular cyclical revision of assessment.(a) Regular revisions.--A county shall conduct regular countywide revisions of assessment according to the assessment 20250SB0567PN1099 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 schedule established by the department under section 88A05 (relating to schedule of cyclical revision of assessment).(b) Individual parcel data review.--In support of the county's responsibilities under subsection (a), a county shall conduct a parcel data review of each parcel not less than once every 10 years.(c) Notification.--The commissioners, or the body or individual exercising equivalent authority, of each county shall notify the Secretary of Revenue in writing no later than 30 days after a county has certified its assessment rolls based on a completed countywide revision of assessment.(d) Legal presumption.--The assessment rolls of a county that is in compliance with this section shall be presumed to be uniform for the purpose of any proceeding before a court of competent jurisdiction unless a party can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the:(1) latest countywide revision of assessment was based on systemically deficient data collection or analysis; or(2) coefficient of dispersion and the price-related differential in the county are outside of the parameters for the type of property established under the standards published by the International Association of Assessing Officers Standards in effect on the effective date of this paragraph or under industry best standards.(e) Appeals limited.--During a period that a legal presumption exists under subsection (d), a taxing district has the right to appeal an assessment, notwithstanding section 8848(c) (relating to special provisions relating to countywide revisions of assessments) or 8855 (relating to appeals by taxing districts) or any other law, if one of the following conditions 20250SB0567PN1099 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is met:(1) the appeal is from an assessment created during a countywide reassessment and the appeal is filed by the first day of September or the annual appeal date established by the commissioners, or the body or individual exercising equivalent authority, of each county of the taxable year following the year for which the newly established values from the countywide reassessment shall take effect;(2) a parcel of land is divided and conveyed away in smaller parcels; or(3) a change has occurred in the productive use of the property or parcel by material alteration in the nature of the use or through alteration or additions that modify the use.§ 88A05. Schedule of cyclical revision of assessment.(a) Initial assessment schedule.--The department shall establish a schedule for each county to conduct an initial countywide revision of assessment under this chapter which shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin on or before January 1, 2026. The schedule shall require between 10 and 15 counties to certify their assessment rolls based on a completed countywide revision of assessment on or before November 15, 2027, and each year thereafter such that the schedule includes each county within a five-year period. The department shall consider the following factors in establishing the schedule:(1) Date of the last countywide revision of assessment.(2) Number of parcels in each county.(3) Geography and population such that each scheduled 20250SB0567PN1099 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year includes a selection of counties from different parts of this Commonwealth, including rural, suburban and urban communities.(4) The number and location of school districts lying in more than one county.(b) Cyclical reassessment schedule.--On or before January 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, the department shall publish an updated county reassessment schedule. The schedule shall require each county to complete a countywide revision of assessment every five years. In the event that a county completes a countywide revision of assessment prior to the year designated in the department's schedule, the department shall adjust the schedule in the next yearly publication.§ 88A06. Funding cyclical revision of assessment.(a) Estimation of cost.--No later than September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, the commissioners, or the body or individual exercising equivalent authority, of each county shall adopt a resolution publishing an estimate of the costs of compliance with this chapter over a five-year period.(b) Supplemental revenue in support of countywide reassessment.--To defray the costs to the county to comply with this chapter, the commissioners, or the body or individual exercising equivalent authority, of each county may:(1) adopt a fee reasonably calculated to meet the costs estimated in subsection (a), repayment of self-liquidating debt under subsection (c), or both, and not to exceed $20 per year, on each parcel of real property in the county; or(2) levy a tax not to exceed one mill in addition to the county's general millage.(c) Operating reserve fund.--Any revenue collected under 20250SB0567PN1099 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b) that is not expended by the county to meet the county's obligations under this chapter in the current year, or earmarked for repayment of debt under subsection (d) shall be deposited into the county's operating reserve fund to provide for future expenses related to countywide revisions of assessment.(d) Self-liquidating debt.--A county may issue self-liquidating debt under Subpart B of Part VII (relating to indebtedness and borrowing) to finance the county's costs to comply with this chapter.§ 88A07. Noncompliance.If a county fails to certify the county's assessment rolls based on a completed countywide revision of assessment in accordance with the department's initial and cyclical schedules under section 88A05 (relating to schedule of cyclical revision of assessment), the department shall withhold all future payments of funds to the county otherwise payable under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9010 (relating to disposition and use of tax) until the delinquent countywide revision of assessment is completed and notification of the revision of assessment is provided to the department under section 88A04(c) (relating to regular cyclical revision of assessment).CHAPTER 88BSTATE TAX EQUALIZATION BOARDSec.88B01. Short title.88B02. Definitions.88B03. Creation of board.88B04. Membership.88B05. Chairperson.20250SB0567PN1099 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 88B06. Quorum.88B07. Individual powers of members of the board.88B08. Administrative assistance. 88B09. General powers and duties.88B10. Compilation of data.88B11. Monthly reports by counties and Commonwealth payments.88B12. Annual reports of local assessing officials.88B13. Market value and percentage of value.88B14. Certification.88B15. Objections.88B16. Annual adjustments.88B17. Determination and apportionment.88B18. Special aid to school districts.88B19. Common level ratio.88B20. Publication of information by board.88B21. State Tax Equalization Advisory Committee.88B22. Construction.88B23. Funding contingency.§ 88B01. Short title.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the State Tax Equalization Board Law.§ 88B02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory committee." The State Tax Equalization Advisory Committee established under section 88B21 (relating to State Tax Equalization Advisory Committee)."Board." The State Tax Equalization Board established under section 88B03 (relating to creation of board).20250SB0567PN1099 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth.§ 88B03. Creation of board.The State Tax Equalization Board is established within the department.§ 88B04. Membership.The board shall consist of the following three ex officio members who shall receive no compensation as a board member:(1) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Revenue or a designee.§ 88B05. Chairperson.The Governor shall designate one of the members as chairperson. The chairperson shall be in charge of the administration of the board and the transaction of the board's routine business and shall execute the orders and policies of the board. The chairperson may delegate to a member the authority to act for the chairperson.§ 88B06. Quorum.Two members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and any action of the board shall require the approval of two members.§ 88B07. Individual powers of members of the board.(a) Authority.--Any investigation, inquiry or hearing, which the board has power to undertake or hold, may be undertaken or held by one or more individual members of the board.(b) Effect.--(1) Conduct under subsection (a) shall be deemed to be conduct of the board.(2) In order to be effective, any determination, ruling or order based upon conduct under subsection (a) must be:20250SB0567PN1099 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) approved and confirmed by a quorum of the board; and(ii) filed in the office of the board.(3) Upon compliance with paragraph (2), the determination, ruling or order shall be the determination, ruling or order of the board.(c) Agents and examiners.--(1) In any investigation, inquiry or hearing, which may be instituted, the board is authorized to employ special agents or examiners.(2) Agents and examiners under this subsection are authorized to administer oaths, examine witnesses and receive evidence, in a locality designated by the board. Evidence under this paragraph shall have the same force and effect as if taken or received by the board or any one or more of its members under subsections (a) and (b).§ 88B08. Administrative assistance.The department shall provide appropriate administrative, legal and technical support as needed by the board in order to accomplish the board's purpose.§ 88B09. General powers and duties.The board has the following powers and duties:(1) To determine the market value of taxable real property in each school district and conduct investigations, require information and have access to public records necessary to make the determination under this paragraph.(2) To require the board of revision of taxes of a county of the first class, or a successor agency, and the county commissioners, or the body or individual exercising equivalent authority, of each county other than a county of 20250SB0567PN1099 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the first class, to furnish a monthly list of all conveyances or other transfers of real estate, or any interest in real estate, recorded within the county during the preceding month, stating the value of the Federal tax stamps affixed to the deed for each conveyance and the assessed valuations for county tax purposes of the real estate.(3) To certify to the Department of Education and to the board of school directors of each school district:(i) by July 1 of each odd-numbered year, a list of all school districts showing a four-year average of the market value of taxable real property and the assessed valuation for county tax purposes; and(ii) by July 1 of each even-numbered year, the changes in market values which result from properties going on or off the assessment rolls for taxation purposes.(3.1) By July 1 of each odd-numbered year, to furnish to the board of school directors of each school district information as pertains to taxable real property in that school district.(4) To hear and decide appeals of parties that are aggrieved by a finding or conclusion of the board.(5) To:(i) investigate the finances and general circumstances of a school district requesting special aid from the Department of Education; and(ii) advise the Department of Education in making grants of special aid.(6) To make surveys and investigations of the finances of school districts in the interest of a more equitable 20250SB0567PN1099 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distribution of school support.(7) To subpoena State and local officials and to require from them information as necessary for the proper discharge of its duties.(8) To discharge functions imposed upon departmental administrative boards by the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(9) To establish, annually, by July 1, a common level ratio of assessed value to market value in each county for the prior calendar year. Ratio calculations must be conducted following the current standards published by the International Association of Assessing Officers.(10) To meet as necessary and at least every other month to approve or confirm any determination, ruling or order pursuant to section 88B07 (relating to individual powers of members of the board).(11) To create in consultation with the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania and the Assessors' Association of Pennsylvania an operations manual to be utilized by counties when completing a countywide reassessment or when valuating property.(12) To create and maintain a centralized and standardized Statewide database for counties to utilize and report to the board all property values and data as required by the board.(13) To develop and maintain Statewide training programs for all persons involved in the valuation of property within all of the counties of this Commonwealth. These programs shall provide basic and detailed training that shall be completed and passed by any person employed to collect, 20250SB0567PN1099 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compile, compare or handle data associated with the valuation of any property for purposes of reassessment valuation within this Commonwealth.(14) To develop standards on contracting for assessment services in consultation with the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania and the Assessors' Association of Pennsylvania, taking into consideration the standards published by the International Association of Assessing Officers. The standards shall:(i) Require that the methodology used by any person, company or organization to value property in this Commonwealth be made public.(ii) State that all data and calculations are the property of the county and this Commonwealth.(15) To develop and maintain technical assistance, Statewide standards and training programs to assist counties in conducting countywide revisions of assessment in compliance with Chapter 88A (relating to regular cyclical revision of assessment).(16) To request meetings of, and consult with, the advisory committee as needed to fulfill the duties under this section.§ 88B10. Compilation of data.(a) Requirement.--The board shall accumulate and compile data:(1) showing the prices at which real property in each school district has been sold and all other available matter relevant to the market value of real property in all school districts; and(2) concerning new sales and improvements and other data 20250SB0567PN1099 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to ensure that the records of the board show the current present market value of real property in each school district as nearly as the same can be determined.(b) Authority.--In compiling data under subsection (a), the board is authorized to examine the following:(1) Local tax assessment records maintained by local assessors or county and city assessors and boards, commissions or departments charged with the duty of revising assessments.(2) Public records.§ 88B11. Monthly reports by counties and Commonwealth payments.(a) Duty.--(1) It shall be the duty of the following entities to prepare, certify and electronically deliver to the board, on the 15th day of each month, a list as prescribed by the board of all conveyances or other transfers of real estate or any interest in real estate, conveyed consistent with any procedures for excluding sales data established in accordance with section 88B20(a)(2) (relating to publication of information by board), recorded within the county during the preceding month:(i) In counties of the first class, the board of revision of taxes or its successor agency.(ii) In counties of the second class, the office of property assessment or its successor agency.(iii) In counties of the second class A through eighth class, the board as defined in section 8802 (relating to definitions).(2) The list under paragraph (1) shall include the value of the Federal tax stamps affixed to the deed for each 20250SB0567PN1099 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conveyance or transfer as set forth on the list and the assessed valuation for county tax purposes of the real estate.(3) At the end of each month, a list of all the real estate conveyed or transferred within the county during the month, stating the value of Federal tax stamps affixed to the instrument conveying or transferring the real estate or any interest in the real estate, shall be prepared and delivered as follows:(i) In counties of the first class, the recorder of deeds shall prepare and deliver the list to the board of revision of taxes or its successor agency.(ii) In all counties except for a county of the first class, the recorder of deeds shall prepare and deliver the list to the county commissioners or the body or agency exercising equivalent authority.(b) Payment.--The board shall pay to the board of revision of taxes, or its successor agency, of counties of the first class and to the county commissioners, or the body or individual exercising equivalent authority of every county except a county of the first class the sum of 20¢ for each conveyance or transfer of real estate on each list prepared, certified and delivered to the board for its use under this section.§ 88B12. Annual reports of local assessing officials.By June 1 of each year, the following entities shall file with the board a certificate prescribed by the board, and on blanks furnished by the board, showing the assessed valuation of all real property in each school district in the county on which the taxes for the then current year are levied:(1) The board of revision of taxes, or its successor 20250SB0567PN1099 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency, of counties of the first class.(2) The office of property assessment, or its successor agency, of counties of the second class.(3) The board as defined in section 8802 (relating to definitions).§ 88B13. Market value and percentage of value.From the data compiled under section 88B12 (relating to annual reports of local assessing officials), the board shall as soon as possible after July 1 of each year determine the market value of real property in each school district, the percentage of the market value as determined by the assessed valuation for county tax purposes, and the four-year moving average of market values.§ 88B14. Certification.As soon as the market value of the real property in each school district in this Commonwealth has been determined and the percentage of the value of the assessed valuation for county tax purposes has been established, the board shall certify the amounts to the Department of Education and for each school district to the board of school directors.§ 88B15. Objections.A school district aggrieved by a finding or conclusion of the board affecting the amount of any Commonwealth subsidy payable to the school district may file written objections with the board, to which the following shall apply:(1) The board shall conduct a hearing at which the board and the school district may submit evidence to show that the findings of the board are incorrect and present arguments to substantiate its contentions.(2) Following review of all the evidence submitted and 20250SB0567PN1099 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the arguments of the school district, the board may make modifications and adjustments of its findings and computations as appropriate or dismiss the objections. The board shall prepare written findings of fact based upon all the evidence submitted.(3) Any valuations adjusted under paragraph (2) shall form the basis of valuations used to determine the amounts of Commonwealth educational subsidies.§ 88B16. Annual adjustments.By July 1 of each odd-numbered year, the board shall adjust the market value of real property in each school district to conform with new data accumulated since the market values for the last preceding two years were determined. The board shall determine the percentage of the market value of the assessed valuation of all real property in the school district on which county taxes for the then current year are levied. The market values, percentages and adjustments shall be certified to the Department of Education and each school district with the same right to hearings as provided under section 88B15 (relating to objections).§ 88B17. Determination and apportionment.(a) Certification.--As soon as possible each odd-numbered year and after the final adjustment of values by the board, the board shall certify to the Department of Education the market value of all real property in each school district.(b) Standard reimbursement fraction.--Each school district's assessed valuation to be used for purposes of computing its standard reimbursement fraction shall be the market value under subsection (a).(c) Payments.--Every two years the market value under 20250SB0567PN1099 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a) shall be used by the Department of Education to determine the amount of funds needed to meet payments required by law to school districts and career and technical schools within the two fiscal years beginning every June 1 and ending every May 31. The Department of Education shall allot the payments to the respective school districts.§ 88B18. Special aid to school districts.Before granting any special aid to a school district, the Department of Education shall submit the request for special aid to the board. The board shall make its recommendations with consideration given to the school district's ability to raise funds by taxation. Before making any recommendation, the board shall carefully investigate and study the financial circumstances of the school district and whether or not it has exhausted its available taxing power not only on real property, but also on all other available property and subjects of taxation, and that collection of taxes is being effectively conducted and enforced. Recommendations shall be transmitted to the Department of Education.§ 88B19. Common level ratio.(a) Establishment.--The board shall annually, prior to July 1, establish for each county a common level ratio for the prior calendar year.(b) Method.--In arriving at the ratio under subsection (a), the board shall use statistically acceptable techniques, including sales ratio studies. The board's method in arriving at the ratio shall be public information. The ratio shall be certified to the chief assessor of each county and shall be admissible as evidence in any appeal involving real property tax assessments.20250SB0567PN1099 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Appeal.--A political subdivision or taxpayer aggrieved by any finding, conclusion, method or technique of the board made under this section may, in writing, file objections to and appeal de novo the ratio determination to Commonwealth Court. After receiving the objections, the board may grant a hearing and may modify or adjust its findings and computations as appropriate.(d) Review.--If the common level ratio increases or decreases by 10% or more, the board shall immediately review its findings prior to certification of the ratio.§ 88B20. Publication of information by board.(a) Publication of information.--The board shall publish the following information, which shall be updated annually:(1) The statistical methods used to calculate the common level ratio and the State Tax Equalization Board market ratio.(2) Procedures for excluding sales data and how the procedures compare with practices of the International Association of Assessing Officers.(3) Procedures to ensure that dissimilar properties are not treated as a single group.(4) Standards to be used for sales sample size and procedures to be used when sales samples are not adequate.(b) Transmission of data from contractor.--If a municipality contracts for services relating to an assessment, the data collected by the contractor must be transmitted to the municipality within 60 days of its collection or development.§ 88B21. State Tax Equalization Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The State Tax Equalization Advisory Committee is established within the department for purposes of 20250SB0567PN1099 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providing the board with technical support, responding to issues presented to it by the board and making recommendations in order to assist the board with fulfilling its duties under this chapter. The department shall provide administrative, legal and technical support as needed by the advisory committee in order to accomplish its purpose.(b) Membership.--The advisory committee shall consist of 13 voting members, selected as follows:(1) A designee of the Secretary of Revenue who shall be an employee of the department.(2) A designee of the Secretary of Community and Economic Development who shall be an employee of the Department of Community and Economic Development.(3) A designee of the Secretary of Education who shall be an employee of the Department of Education.(4) One member of the Local Government Commission appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(5) One member of the Local Government Commission appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(6) One member of the Local Government Commission appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(7) One member of the Local Government Commission appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(8) The following members appointed by the Governor as follows:(i) One representative of the Local Government Commission who is not a commission member and is appointed in consultation with the Executive Director of the Local Government Commission.20250SB0567PN1099 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Three representatives of county government with experience in property valuation assessment and taxation. One representative shall be from a county of the first class appointed from a list of three qualified individuals recommended by the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania. One representative shall be from a county of the second class or second class A appointed from a list of three qualified individuals recommended by the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania. One representative shall be from a county of the third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh or eighth class appointed from a list of three qualified individuals recommended by the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania.(iii) Two representatives of the Assessors' Association of Pennsylvania appointed in consultation with the Executive Director of the Assessors' Association of Pennsylvania.(c) Terms of appointment.--(1) The terms of the members appointed under subsection (b)(1), (2) and (3) shall continue so long as the appointing public official continues to serve in an official position.(2) The terms of the members appointed under subsection (b)(4), (5), (6) and (7) shall coincide with the terms of their respective elective offices. The members may not continue to serve on the advisory committee beyond the expiration of their term.(3) The members under subsection (b)(8) shall be appointed by the Governor for staggered five-year terms.(d) Initial appointment, expiration and vacancy.--An 20250SB0567PN1099 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointing authority shall appoint initial members to the advisory committee within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection. When a vacancy occurs on the advisory committee, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor member within 90 days of the vacancy. Except for members appointed under subsection (b)(4), (5), (6) and (7), a member whose term has expired shall continue as a member of the advisory committee until a replacement has been appointed. An expired member shall have full voting rights and count towards a quorum. In no event shall a member continue to serve on the advisory committee beyond 180 days from the date of the term expiration.(e) Organization.--The members of the advisory committee shall elect from among themselves a member to serve as chairperson and any other officers as they deem necessary.(f) Compensation.--The members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed by the Commonwealth for all necessary expenses incurred while attending meetings of the advisory committee.(g) Meetings.--The advisory committee shall meet as often as necessary at the call of the chairperson of the advisory committee, who shall also call meetings at the request of the board. There shall be at least two weeks' notice to each member of the advisory committee of any meeting.(h) Quorum.--Seven members of the advisory committee shall constitute a quorum. A majority of the advisory committee shall be necessary to take any action of the advisory committee.§ 88B22. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change or affect the validity of the assessed valuation of any real property for the purpose of levying taxes by any political 20250SB0567PN1099 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subdivision.§ 88B23. Funding contingency.The board's authority to carry out the duties set forth in section 88B09(11), (12), (13) and (14) (relating to general powers and duties) is contingent upon receipt of an appropriation in an amount sufficient to complete these duties.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88B.(2) Chapter 15 of the act of June 27, 1996 (P.L.403, No.58), known as the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act, is repealed.(3) All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 4. The addition of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88B is a continuation of Chapter 15 of the act of June 27, 1996 (P.L.403, No.58), known as the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act. The following apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88B, all activities initiated under Chapter 15 of the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88B. Resolutions, orders, regulations, rules, decisions and sequence of methods used for arriving at market value for odd-numbered and even-numbered years which were made under Chapter 15 of the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act and which are in effect on the effective date of this section shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 53 Pa.C.S. 20250SB0567PN1099 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Ch. 88B. Contracts, obligations and agreements entered into under Chapter 15 of the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of Chapter 15 of the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act.(2) The Legislative Reference Bureau has the power and duty to recodify regulations of the State Tax Equalization Board to effectuate the addition of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88B.(3) Except as set forth in paragraph (4), any difference in language between 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88B and Chapter 15 of the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act is intended only to conform to the style of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes and is not intended to change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administrative interpretation and implementation of the State Tax Equalization Board Law.(4) Paragraph (3) does not apply to the following provisions:(i) Replacing the Department of Community and Economic Development with the Department of Revenue.(ii) The addition of 53 Pa.C.S. § 88B04.(iii) The addition of 53 Pa.C.S. § 88B09(15).Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0567PN1099 - 25 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223